Georgia, session 2025_26, HB449.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 44 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to property, is amended in
Article 3 of Chapter 5, relating to covenants and warranties, by adding a new Code section
to read as follows:
- 1 -

LC 55 0635S
"44-5-60.1.
(a) No covenant running with the land shall prohibit or restrict a property owner from
installing, operating, or maintaining a water well on such property owner's property that
exclusively provides water for irrigation purposes to such property, provided that such
water well does not provide water to any other parcel of land that is not owned by such
property owner and such property owner does not sell water from such water well or, in
exchange for consideration, authorize the use of such water well by any other person.
(b) Any provision in a covenant running with the land, or any subsidiary document
adopted pursuant to a covenant running with the land, that violates subsection (a) of this
Code section is declared to be contrary to public policy and shall be void and
unenforceable.
(c) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the provisions of this Code section shall
apply to any covenant running with the land, or any subsidiary document adopted pursuant
to a covenant running with the land, regardless of when such covenant running with the
land was created or became effective.
(d) Nothing in this Code section is intended to prevent the application of any provision of
law or regulation of any county, municipality, or consolidated government concerning the
installation, operation, or maintenance of water wells in this state."
SECTION 2.
Title 46 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to public utilities and public
transportation, is amended by revising Chapter 10, which is reserved, as follows:
"CHAPTER 10
46-10-1.
As used in this chapter, the term:
- 2 -

LC 55 0635S
(1) 'Covered water system' means any water system that is owned and operated by a
private company and that provides water services by means of pipes or conduits to 2,000
or more customer service connections in this state. Such term shall not include any water
system that is owned or operated by the state or any political subdivision or authority
thereof.
(2) 'Surface water' means all rivers, streams, branches, creeks, ponds, tributary streams,
drainage basins, natural lakes, and artificial reservoirs and impoundments.
(3) 'Water services' means water services, sanitary sewer services, or both.
(4) 'Water system' means a system for the provision to the public of piped water for
human consumption that is sourced exclusively from surface water, sanitary sewer
services, or both. Such term includes but is not limited to any collection, treatment,
storage, and distribution facilities under the control of the operator of such system and
used primarily in connection with such system and any collection or pretreatment storage
facilities not under such control which are used primarily in connection with such system.
46-10-2.
(a) No company that owns a covered water system shall enter into or seek to enforce any
contractual provision that prohibits or restricts the ability of any customer of such company
who receives water services from such company through such covered water system from
installing, operating, or maintaining a water well on such customer's property that
exclusively provides water for irrigation purposes to such customer, provided that such
water well does not provide water to any parcel of land that is not owned by such customer
and such customer does not sell water from such water well or, in exchange for
consideration, authorize the use of such water well by any other person.
(b) Any contractual provision entered into by a company that owns a covered water system
that violates the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section is declared to be contrary
to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.
- 3 -

LC 55 0635S
(c) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the provisions of this Code section shall
apply to any contractual provision entered into by a company that owns a covered water
system regardless of when such contractual provision was entered into or otherwise became
effective.
46-10-3.
No company that owns a covered water system shall prohibit any customer of such
company who receives water services from such company through such covered water
system from installing, operating, or maintaining, or discontinue the provision of water
services to such customer solely due to the installation, operation, or maintenance of, a
water well on such customer's property that exclusively provides water for irrigation
services to such customer; provided that such water well does not provide water to any
parcel of land that is not owned by such customer and such customer does not sell water
from such water well or, in exchange for consideration, authorize the use of such water
well by another person.
46-10-4.
Nothing in this chapter is intended to prevent the application of any provision of law or
regulation of any county, municipality, or consolidated government concerning the
installation, operation, or maintenance of water wells in this state. Reserved."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 4 -